Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1952
Step Up to Quality Child Care Act; act, how cited.

Sections 71-1952 to 71-1964
shall be known and may be cited as the Step Up to Quality Child Care Act.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 1.